Tennessee statutes. Title 30 Administration of Estates
Part 3 Inventory and Management
30-2-317. Priority of claims — Payment — Contested or unmatured claims.

All claims or demands against the estate of any deceased person shall be divided into the following classifications, which shall have priority in the order shown:

First: Costs of administration, including, but not limited to, premiums on the fiduciary bonds and reasonable compensation to the personal representative and the personal representative's counsel;

Second: Reasonable funeral expenses;

Third: Taxes and assessments imposed by the federal or any state government or subdivision of the federal or any state government, including claims by the bureau of TennCare pursuant to § 71-5-116 and including city and county governments; and

Fourth: All other demands that may be filed as aforementioned within four (4) months after the date of notice to creditors.

All demands against the estate shall be paid by the personal representative in the order in which they are classed, and no demand of one class shall be paid until the claims of all prior classes are satisfied or provided for; and if there are not sufficient assets to pay the whole of any one class, the claims in that class shall be paid pro rata.

Debts due upon bills single, bonds, bills of exchange and promissory notes, whether with or without seal, and upon settled and liquidated accounts signed by the debtor, are of equal dignity, unless otherwise provided, and are to be paid accordingly.

The personal representative shall hold aside sufficient funds or other assets to pay each contested or unmatured claim (or the proper ratable portion thereof, as the case may be) with interest (if the claim be one bearing interest), until it is determined whether or not the claim is to be paid, or until an unmatured claim has reached maturity, also sufficient assets to meet the expenses of pending litigation and costs of court and any unpaid taxes.

Code 1858, § 2250 (deriv. Acts 1786, ch. 4, § 2); Shan., § 3983; mod. Code 1932, § 8195; Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 4; 1947, ch. 137, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.5 (Williams, § 8196.4); Acts 1971, ch. 229, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-520; Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 7; 2001, ch. 400, § 1; 2006, ch. 639, § 2; 2014, ch. 883, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that this section shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Cross-References. Disbursement of decedent's shares or assets in possession of credit union, § 45-4-405.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 785, 788, 789, 841, 907, 1144.

Law Reviews.

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707 (1978).

30-2-318. Payment of claims prior to time fixed for payment.

At any time prior to the expiration of the period fixed for the payment of claims, the personal representative may pay the preferred claims as provided in § 30-2-317 for which the estate may be liable, and upon order of court any debt of the decedent for which security may have been given that is in danger of being sold by way of foreclosure to the detriment of the estate.

If the executor or administrator knows or is willing to undertake that an estate is solvent, the executor or administrator may pay debts, but if the executor or administrator pays any debts other than those specified in subsection (a) prior to the expiration of the time fixed for the payment of claims, and the estate proves insolvent, the executor or administrator and the sureties of the executor or administrator shall be liable to each and every creditor for the creditor's ratable share of the insolvent estate.

Code 1858, § 2325 (deriv. Acts 1851-1852, ch. 283, § 1); Shan., § 4064; mod. Code 1932, § 8260; modified; Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.5 (Williams, § 8196.4); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 30-521, 30-522.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 747, 786, 789.

30-2-319. Time for payment of claims.

All uncontested claims and all contested claims that have been finally adjudged and allowed shall be paid by the personal representative as soon as practicable (not in any event to exceed ninety (90) days) after the expiration of the date on which the personal representative could file an exception to the claim pursuant to § 30-2-314(a), if, after having segregated sufficient assets to meet the contingent liabilities referred to in § 30-2-317, adequate assets are in the personal representative's hands for this purpose, payment being made according to the classification of the claims.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 4; 1941, ch. 62, § 1; 1947, ch. 137, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.5 (Williams, § 8196.4); Acts 1971, ch. 229, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-523; Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 8; 2012, ch. 886, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that the amendments to this section by that act shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Cross-References. Early payment of claims, § 30-2-318.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 788, 1144.

Collateral References.

Presumption of payment from possession by debtor as administrator to creditor, of paper evidencing obligation. 70 A.L.R. 879, 156 A.L.R. 777.

Relation back of letters testamentary or of administration to cover payment of debts and legacies before letters are granted. 26 A.L.R. 1366.

Renewal note made or indorsed by personal representative of obligor in original paper as payment or novation of that paper. 12 A.L.R. 1546.

30-2-320. Pending actions considered legally filed demands — Manner of revival.

All actions pending against any person at the time of that person's death, that by law may survive against the personal representative, shall be considered demands legally filed against the estate at the time of the filing with the clerk of the court in which the estate is being administered of a copy in duplicate of the order of revivor, one (1) of which copies shall be certified or attested, a notation of which shall be entered by the clerk in the record of claims, as in the case of other claims filed. Pending actions not so revived against the personal representative within the period prescribed in § 30-2-307(a) shall abate.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 5; 1947, ch. 137, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.6 (Williams, § 8196.5); Acts 1971, ch. 229, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-524; Acts 1989, ch. 395, § 8.

Cross-References. Order of substitution of parties, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Revivor of actions generally, title 20, ch. 5, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 25.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 711, 713, 753, 766, 784, 859.

Law Reviews.

Administration of Estates — Revival of Actions — Time Limitations, 36 Tenn. L. Rev. 804 (1969).

30-2-321. Computation of time.

Wherever in this title any period of time is required to be computed from the date of the notice to creditors, the computation shall be made from the date of the first publication of the notice, in case of published notices, or from the date of the posting of the notice, in case of posted notices, as shown by the filed proof of the publication or of the posting of the notices as required by § 30-2-306.

Acts 1939, ch. 175, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 8196.12 (Williams, § 8196.9); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 30-525.

Cross-References. Computation of time, § 1-3-102.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 757, 768, 780.

30-2-322. Continuance of decedent's business.

The probate court of the county of the decedent's residence at the time of decease, when not contrary to the decedent's will, if any, may authorize the personal representative to continue the business of the decedent upon such conditions as it may impose, for an original period not exceeding nine (9) months from the date of the executor's or administrator's appointment. This authority may be granted upon such notice as the court considers reasonable, or without prior notice, either at the time of the qualification of the personal representative, if the petition for appointment contains a prayer therefor, or thereafter during the period of administration.

If, prior to the granting of this authority, notice has not been given to all parties in interest, it shall be given within five (5) days thereafter, or within such extended time as the court, for cause shown shall allow, in a manner and for a period considered reasonable by the court.

The court, for cause shown, and upon such notice as it considers reasonable, may extend this authority beyond nine (9) months.

Any party in interest may, at any time, petition the court to revoke or modify an order granting authority to the personal representative to continue a decedent's business.

Acts 1955, ch. 138, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 30-526, 30-527.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 683, 718, 1016.

Law Reviews.

Non-Tax Aspects of Estate Planning (Ronald Lee Gilman), 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (1972).

Wills and Fiduciary Powers (Robert L. McMurray), 31 Tenn. L. Rev. 191 (1964).

Collateral References.

Preference or priority of claims arising out of continuation of decedent's business by personal representative. 83 A.L.R.2d 1406.

30-2-323. Advances for property maintenance expenses.

Unless contrary to the decedent's will, the personal representative of the estate is authorized, but not required, to advance or to pay as an expense of administration for a period of up to four (4) months after the decedent's death the reasonable costs of routine upkeep of any real property passing under the will of the decedent or by intestate succession. These authorized expenditures, which may be made in the personal representative's discretion, shall include those for utility services, day-to-day maintenance, lawn service, and insurance premiums but shall not include mortgage note payments, real estate taxes, major repairs or other extraordinary expenses. None of the foregoing limitations shall apply to any real property that is actually part of the probate estate being administered.

Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 426, § 26 provided that this section shall apply to all estates of decedents dying on or after January 1, 1998, and to all wills, other documents and proceedings related thereto.

Law Reviews.

Vesting of Title in Probate Estate: The Curious Meaning of Words (Dan Holbrook), 38 No. 12 Tenn. B.J. 26 (2002).

30-2-324. Dismissing probate case without prejudice after notice.

After notice has been sent to the last known address of the personal representative of the estate, the attorney for the estate and any beneficiaries of the estate, the court may enter an order, without liability to the clerk of the county of administration, dismissing, without prejudice, a probate case if:

No order of disposition has been entered;

The case has been open for a period of time in which disposition could have occurred, but in no event less than eighteen (18) months from the order opening the estate; and

The administration of the estate remains incomplete.

A dismissal pursuant to this section shall only operate to close the administration and not invalidate any previous order of the court in the proceeding.

Acts 2011, ch. 417, § 2.